Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 1 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
43-1-129. Road usage charge study - report - repeal.

The department shall study the feasibility of implementing a road usage charge program in the state. The study must, at a minimum:

Identify and analyze the implementation of road usage charge programs in other states;

Identify and assess available and developing technology for tracking mileage and collecting road usage charges;

Identify barriers to implementing a road usage charge program and identify and assess options for overcoming those barriers; and

Identify ways in which the state can consult or coordinate with other states that have road usage charge programs and with regional groups that have road usage charge program information and expertise to leverage their experience and expertise and ensure that any road usage charge program to be implemented in the state is implemented in accordance with identified and established best practices.

The department shall present the report to the transportation legislation review committee created in section 43-2-145 (1) during the 2023 legislative interim.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-260), ch. 250, p. 1415, § 30, effective June 17.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 21-260, see section 1 of chapter 250, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

43-1-130. Autonomous motor vehicles study - report - repeal.

The department shall study issues relating to the development and adoption of autonomous motor vehicles. The study must, at a minimum:

Summarize the current status of autonomous motor vehicle technology and the extent of the use of such technology in commercial and government motor vehicle fleets and personal motor vehicles;

Provide an estimated timeline for future advancements in autonomous motor vehicle technology, in particular advancements that enable motor vehicle automation to attain higher levels in the motor vehicle classification system adopted by the United States department of transportation, and the adoption of such advancements for use in commercial and government motor vehicle fleets and personal motor vehicles;

Summarize the anticipated safety benefits, including benefits to transportation systems associated with the transition to automated commercial and government motor vehicle fleets and personal motor vehicles, and safety risks, including cybersecurity risks, of autonomous motor vehicles;

Identify any modifications or additions that existing state transportation infrastructure may need to enable the use of autonomous motor vehicles, the timeline for making such modifications or additions, and the anticipated cost of making such modifications or additions; and

Identify and summarize legal issues relating to the use of autonomous motor vehicles.

The department shall present the report to the transportation legislation review committee created in section 43-2-145 (1) during the 2025 legislative interim.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2026.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-260), ch. 250, p. 1416, § 30, effective June 17.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 21-260, see section 1 of chapter 250, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.